Massachusetts, session 194th, H4938.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 86 the 
following section:-  
Section 87. (a) Definitions. As used in the section:   
(i) “Technology-Assisted Tracking Device” shall mean any wearable device that 
complies with the following imperatives: 
a)Waterproof and able to function under water (which is a major destination as seen 
above), compliant with IP66 and IP68 standards  
b) Works indoors or under cover (Radio Frequency is the best technology for this), and 
does not need direct line of sight to the sky (GPS)  
c) Not dependent on third-party public communication networks (such as cellular, GSM, 
GPRS, or similar as these are NOT prevalent everywhere)  

of 2 12  d) Wrist or ankle strap needs to be tamper-resistant, but changeable by the caregiver 
directly  
e) System specifics need to avoid false alarms in order not to waste LE and SAR time, 
and have a patient specific code for each device so as to avoid mistaken identities  
(b) A health benefit plan shall provide full coverage, subject to all applicable co-
payments, coinsurance, deductibles, and out-of-pocket limits, for insured individuals who are 
diagnosed by a license physician with dementia, Alzheimer's disease, or Autism spectrum 
Disorder, to obtain a Technology-Assisted Tracking Device if they or their guardian choose.